Utah statutes.
10-8-85.6.   Definitions -- Electronic payments -- Fee.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Electronic payment" means the payment of money to a municipality by
electronic means, including by means of a credit card, charge card, debit
card, prepaid or stored value card or similar device, or automatic
clearinghouse transaction.
(b)  "Electronic payment fee" means an amount of money to defray the discount
fee, processing fee, or other fee charged by a credit card company or
processing agent to process an electronic payment.
(c)  "Processing agent" means a bank, transaction clearinghouse, or other
third party that charges a fee to process an electronic payment.
(2)  A municipality may accept an electronic payment for the payment of funds
which the municipality could have received through another payment method.
(3)  A municipality that accepts an electronic payment may charge an
electronic payment fee.
